dictsource/fi_rules
// Finnish translation rules
// This file is UTF-8 encoded


// NOTE: aii, auu, eii etc. are pronounced [a|i:], [a|u:] and [e|i],
// but aaii, aauu and eeii must be pronounced [a:i:], [a:u:] and [e:i:].

.L01 mei tei hei noi // pronouns for allative case + enclitics  doubling
.L02 a o u            // back vowels
.L03 y ä ö            // front vowels
.L04 i e              // neutral vowels

.group a
          a          a
          aa         a:
          ai         ai
          aii        a|i:        // naiivi
          au         au
          auu        a|u:

       &) a (lla_    %a

  _austr) a (l       a:        // double the middle a in australia and its inflections. 


.group ä
          ä          &
          ää         &:
          äi         &i
          äii        &|i:
          äy         &y
          äyy        &|y:

       &) ä (lla_    %&


.group b
          b          b
          bb         b:


.group c
          c          k
          c (i       s
          c (e       s         // Pronounce c as s. Mostly foreign words such as celcius, center, cervantes, cezanne.
          c (y       s
          cc         k:        // Utter cc as k. This includes rebecca, accord, puccini etc.

       K) ch (r      k
          city       siti      // Pronounce foreign word city as siti. Include all inflections and compound words.
                               // eg. city, citystä, intercity.


.group d
          d          d
          dd         d:


.group e
          e          e
          ee         e:
          ei         ei
          eii        e|i:    // fenoliftaleiini
          eu         eu
          euu        e|u:
          ey         ey
          eyy        e|y:

       &) e(lla_     %e
       &) e(llä_     %e


.group f
          f          f


.group g
          g          g
          gg         g:


.group h
          h          h
      L02) h (C       x        // /h/ → [x] after back vowels before any consonant (e.g. tuhka → [tuxka], ahma)
      L03) h (C       C        // /h/ → [ç] after front vowels before any consonant (e.g. pyhkiä → [pyçkiä], yhdeksän)
      L04) h (C       C        // /h/ → [ç] after neutral vowels before any consonant (e.g. vihje → [viçje], vihko)


.group i
          i          i
          ii         i:
          iu         iu
          iuu        i|u:
          ie         ie
          iee        i|e:       // dieetti
          iy         iy
          iyy        i|y:

          // iä         ii&      // Improve the i in iä words. Eg. ryhmiä (ryhmä), äitiä.
          // ia         iia      // Improve the i in ia words. Eg. mattia, lattia.

       &) i (lla_    %i


.group j
          j          j


.group k
          k          k
          kk         k:

.group l
          l          l

       @) lle (_     lle_X1    // double the initial consonant of the next word
       @@) llekaan     llek:a:n    // after allative case -lle, double the k and p in enclitics -kaan, -k&&n, -ko, -kY, -kin, -pa and -p&. . Use @@ to exclude words two syllable words ending in -lle like nallekaan. Handles multiple enclitics, for example nallellekaankohan
       @@) llekään     llek:&:n    
       @@) llekin     llek:in    
       @@) lleko     llek:o    
       @@) llekö     llek:Y
       @@) llepa     llep:a  
       @@) llepä     llep:&
       L01) llekaan     llek:a:n    // after allative case -lle, double the k in enclitics -kaan, -k&&n, -ko, -Ky and -kin. Use L01 to include one syllable pronouns meille, teille, heille, noille
       L01) llekään     llek:&:n    
       L01) llekin     llek:in    
       L01) lleko     llek:o    
       L01) llekö     llek:Y
       L01) llepa     llep:a  
       L01) llepä     llep:&



.group m
          m          m

   _sydä) m (A       m:        // double the m in sydämelinnen 


.group n
          n          n
          ng         N:
          ng (K      N    // ng is [N] also when followed by a consonant
          n (p       m
          n (_p      m
          n (k       N
          n (_k      N

       @) nne (_     nne_X1    // double the initial consonant of the next word



.group o
          o          o
          oo         o:
          oi         oi
          oii        o|i:   // heroiini
          ou         ou
          ouu        o|u:

     symb) o (l      o:         // double the o in symboli. Include inflections and compound words.
     symb) o (loi    o   // symboloida with short o



.group ö
          ö          Y
          öö         Y:
          öi         Yi
          öii        Y|i:
          öy         Yy
          öyy        Y|y:



.group p
          p          p
          pp         p:

    _ole) p (a       p:      // double the p in olepa, olepahan.
    _ota) p (a       p:      // double the p in otapa, otapahan.

     kam) p (anj     p:      // double the p in kampanja. Include inflections and compound words.

//     sam) p (oo      p:      // double the p in sampoo. Include inflections and compound words. ”Sampoon” is an inflected form of the word ”sampo” and has a short p. It is not wrong to pronounce sampoo as [s'ampo:] either. Don’t double the p.
    sham) p (o       p:      // double the p in shampo. Include inflections and compound words.


.group q
          q          q
          qq         q:


.group r
          r          r
      CA) rg (_      Rj // follow swedish pronunciation 
     _CA) rg (C     Rj  // follow swedish pronunciation 
          ruoan      ru:an      // Pronounce ruoan as ruuan. Include all inflections and compound words.
                               // eg. ruoanlaitto, ruoankin, arkiruoan

.group s
          s          s
          ss         ss2      // [s2] is a continuation for [s]
       K) sh         S
       @) sh (an_     sh    
       @) sh (än_     sh    // preesens+hän and similar ones with sh as separate sounds


       K) sch        S        // Schmitt

       A) sti (_     sti_X1    // double the initial consonant of the next word only when the –sti ending is preceded by a vowel (e.g. ”teksti” does not double)


.group t
          t          t
          tt         t:
          tz         ts      // German names. Instead of former [tts]

       @) tse (_     tse_X1    // double the initial consonant of the next word


.group u
          u          u
          uu         u:
          ui         ui
//       _) ui         ui   
//      _j) ui         ui   // [ui] sounds better than [wi] when stressed. Especially <jui> at the beginning of the word sounds bad if pronounced [jwi]
          uii        u|i:
          uo         uo
          uoo        u|o:


.group v
          v          v


.group w
          w          v


.group x
          x          ks
          xx         k:s


.group y
          y          y
          yy         y:
          yi         yi
          yii        y|i:
          yö         yY
          yöö        y|Y:



.group z
          z          ts
          zz         ts      // pizza
       K) zh         Z



.group
          å          o
          åå         o:
          ü          y
          üü         y:
          š          S
          ž          Z

          $	     dollarin
      __) - (_D        mi:nus
      A_) - (_D        _
      C_) - (_D        _



 
